Rhode Island statutes. Title 22 General Assembly
Chapter 2 Composition of House of Representatives
22-2-3.
Election duties of local officials.

Wherever in the general laws or in any public law a duty is imposed upon the president of a city or town council or upon the local board of any city or town or upon a city or town clerk, sergeant, or constable in connection with the election of a representative, the duty in the case of a representative district comprising parts or the whole of more than one city or town shall be deemed to be imposed upon the president of the city or town council or local board or city or town clerk, sergeant, or constable of each or all of the cities or towns in which the representative district shall lie. Wherever in the general laws or in any public law a duty is imposed upon the city committee, town committee, or ward committee of a political party in connection with the election of a representative, that duty shall be deemed to be imposed upon the representative district committee of the party as the context shall require.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 42, § 8; P.L. 2022, ch. 5, § 8, effective February 16, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 6, § 8, effective February 16, 2022.

22-2-4.
Reference to a representative from city or town.

Wherever in the general laws or in any public law reference is made to a representative from any city or town, or to the election of a representative from any city or town, the reference shall mean and be deemed to refer to a representative from a representative district, or the election of a representative from a representative district, as the context may require.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 42, § 9; P.L. 2022, ch. 5, § 8, effective February 16, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 6, § 8, effective February 16, 2022.

22-2-5.
[Repealed.]

22-2-6.
Construction of chapter — Legislative purposes.

This chapter shall be liberally construed to effectuate the purposes of it and to apportion the state into representative districts in compliance with the requirements of the United States Constitution. It is intended that the representative districts described in this chapter completely encompass all the area within the state and contain all the citizens resident in the state. It is further intended that the apportionment and districting provided for in this chapter results in the creation of districts containing substantially equal population. It is also intended that no representative district shall include any of the area included within the description of any other representative district. If the districts described in this chapter do not carry out the purposes of them because of patent unintentional omissions, duplications, overlapping areas, erroneous nomenclature, faulty description of boundary lines, street closings, changes in names of streets or of public places, alteration of the courses of rivers or streams, the filling in of lands under water, or changes in shorelines due to accretion, the secretary of state is authorized and empowered to correct the omissions, overlaps, erroneous nomenclature, or other defects in the description of districts so as to accomplish the purposes and objectives of this chapter. In making these corrections, the secretary of state shall be guided by the following standards:

Gaps in the description of any district shall be completed in a manner which results in a total description of the district in manner consonant with the description of adjacent districts.

Areas included within the descriptions of more than one district shall be allocated to the district having the lowest population.

Areas not included within the descriptions of any district shall be allocated to the adjacent district having the lowest population.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 5, § 7, effective February 16, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 6, § 7, effective February 16, 2022.